Wyoming, session 2026, HB0152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-29-701 by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:

17-29-701. Events causing dissolution.

(c) In a proceeding brought under paragraph (a)(v) of
this section, if the court denies the application and finds
that it was made in bad faith, including that the applicant
caused or created the facts and circumstances alleged as
grounds for dissolution, the court may award damages
HB0152

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0424
including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the
limited liability company or any party defending against
the dissolution proceeding.

Section 2. This act shall apply to proceedings
brought under W.S. 17-29-701(a)(v) on or after July 1,
2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0152